Vermont, session 2025-2026, H437.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. RESIDENTIAL UNIVERSAL DESIGN STANDARDS; STUDY
COMMITTEE; REPORT
(a) Creation. There is created the Residential Universal Design Study
Committee to explore implementation of statewide universal design standards
for all residential buildings.
(b) Membership. The Committee shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) one member of the House of Representatives, who shall be
appointed by the Speaker of the House;
VT LEG #379958 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.437
2025 Page 2 of 5
(2) one member of the Senate, who shall be appointed by the Committee
on Committees;
(3) one member, appointed by the Vermont Builders and Remodelers
Association;
(4) one member, appointed by the Vermont Chapter of the American
Institute of Architects;
(5) the Director of Fire Safety of designee;
(6) one member of the Vermont Access Board, appointed by the Chair;
(7) one member, appointed by the Vermont Housing Finance Agency;
(8) one member, appointed by the Vermont Housing Conservation
Board;
(9) one member, appointed by the Housing & Homelessness Alliance of
Vermont;
(10) one member, appointed by the Vermont Center for Independent
Living;
(11) one member, appointed by the Vermont Developmental Disabilities
Council;
(12) one member of the Land Access and Opportunity Board;
(13) one member, appointed by the American Association of Retired
Persons Vermont;
VT LEG #379958 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.437
2025 Page 3 of 5
(14) the Commissioner of Housing and Community Development or
designee;
(15) one member, appointed by the NeighborWorks of Western
Vermont;
(16) one member, appointed by the Vermont Mortgage Bankers
Association;
(17) one member, appointed by the Vermont Bankers Association;
(18) one member, appointed by the Association of Vermont Credit
Unions;
(19) one member, appointed by the Vermont Leagues of Cities and
Towns;
(20) one member, appointed by the Vermont Assessors and Listers
Association;
(21) one member, appointed by the Vermont Association of Realtors;
and
(22) one member, appointed by ADA Inspections Nationwide, LLC.
(c) Powers and duties. The Committee shall study the development and
implementation of statewide universal design standards for residential
buildings, including identification and analysis of the following issues:
(1) existing federal and state laws regarding Americans with Disabilities
Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 12101–12213, standards and building codes;
VT LEG #379958 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.437
2025 Page 4 of 5
(2) existing federal, state, and international best practices and standards
addressing accessibility and adaptability characteristics of single-family and
multiunit buildings;
(3) opportunities and challenges for supporting the residential building
industry in meeting universal design standards, including considerations of
workforce education and training;
(4) cost benefits and impacts of adopting a universal design standard for
residential buildings;
(5) opportunities and challenges with enforcement of identified
standards; and
(6) impacts to the valuation and financing of impacted buildings.
(d) Assistance. The Committee shall have the administrative, technical,
and legal assistance of the Office of Legislative Counsel and the Joint Fiscal
Office.
(e) Report. On or before November 1, 2025, the Committee shall submit a
written report to the House Committee on General and Housing and the Senate
Committee on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs with its
findings and any recommendations for legislative action.
(f) Meetings.
(1) The member of the House of Representatives shall call the first
meeting of the Committee to occur on or before June 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379958 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.437
2025 Page 5 of 5
(2) The Committee shall select a chair from among its members at the
first meeting.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The Committee shall cease to exist on December 1, 2025.
(g) Compensation and reimbursement. For attendance at meetings during
adjournment of the General Assembly, a legislative member of the Committee
serving in the member’s capacity as a legislator shall be entitled to per diem
compensation and reimbursement of expenses pursuant to 2 V.S.A. § 23 for
not more than six meetings. These payments shall be made from monies
appropriated to the General Assembly.
(h) Appropriation. The sum of $200,000.00 is appropriated from the
General Fund in fiscal year 2026 for per diem compensation and
reimbursement of expenses for members of the Committee and to engage the
services of one or more experts as necessary to assist the Committee in its
work pursuant to this section.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379958 v.1